Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.020

Public employees—Payroll deductions authorized.

Any employee or group of employees of the state of Washington or any of its political subdivisions, or of any institution supported, in whole or in part, by the state or any of its political subdivisions, may authorize the deduction from his or her salaries or wages and payment to another, the amount or amounts of his or her subscription payments or contributions to any person, firm, or corporation administering, furnishing, or providing (1) medical, surgical, and hospital care or either of them, or (2) life insurance or accident and health disability insurance, or (3) any individual retirement account selected by the employee or the employee's spouse established under applicable state or federal law: PROVIDED, That such authorization by said employee or group of employees, shall be first approved by the head of the department, division office or institution of the state or any political subdivision thereof, employing such person or group of persons, and filed with the department of enterprise services; or in the case of political subdivisions of the state of Washington, with the auditor of such political subdivision or the person authorized by law to draw warrants against the funds of said political subdivision.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 471; 1998 c 116 s 1; 1982 c 107 s 1; 1973 c 106 s 15; 1947 c 70 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 9963-10.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Group insurance

disability: Chapter 48.21 RCW.

for employees of

cities and towns: RCW 35.23.460.

counties: RCW 36.32.400.

life: Chapter 48.24 RCW.